Alabama, session 2026rs, HB503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Any photograph or image of a deceased
individual or human remains that is taken as part of a coroner
death investigation or law enforcement investigation,
regardless of whether the investigation is active or not, and
regardless of whether the photograph or image was taken by use
Page 1

regardless of whether the photograph or image was taken by use
HB503 INTRODUCED
of a personal electronic device or device belonging to a state
or local agency, is prohibited from being disclosed,
transmitted, or used for any purpose other than an official
coroner or law enforcement purpose or as otherwise authorized
by law.
(b)(1) Any person who violates subsection (a) is guilty
of a Class B misdemeanor.
(2) Any person who, for a consideration or other gain,
including money, goods, or services, discloses or transmits
any photograph or image described in subsection (a) is guilty
of a Class A misdemeanor.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2